Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Carrying Concealed Deadly Weapon
237.115.
Construction of KRS 237.110 — Prohibition by local government units of carrying concealed deadly weapons in governmental buildings — Restriction on criminal penalties.

Except as provided in KRS

527.020

, nothing contained in KRS

237.109

or

237.110

shall be construed to limit, restrict, or prohibit in any manner the right of a college, university, or any postsecondary education facility, including technical schools and community colleges, to control the possession of deadly weapons on any property owned or controlled by them or the right of a unit of state, city, county, urban-county, or charter county government to prohibit the carrying of concealed deadly weapons in that portion of a building actually owned, leased, or occupied by that unit of government.

Except as provided in KRS

527.020

, the legislative body of a state, city, county, or urban-county government may, by statute, administrative regulation, or ordinance, prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed deadly weapons in that portion of a building owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government. That portion of a building in which the carrying of concealed deadly weapons is prohibited or limited shall be clearly identified by signs posted at the entrance to the restricted area. The statute or ordinance shall exempt any building used for public housing by private persons, highway rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government from any restriction on the carrying or possession of deadly weapons. The statute, administrative regulation, or ordinance shall not specify any criminal penalty for its violation but may specify that persons violating the statute or ordinance may be denied entrance to the building, ordered to leave the building, and if employees of the unit of government, be subject to employee disciplinary measures for violation of the provisions of the statute or ordinance. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to be a violation of KRS

65.870

if the requirements of this section are followed. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any other unit of government.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Kentucky Revised Statutes or applicable federal law, no criminal penalty shall attach to carrying a concealed firearm or other deadly weapon at any location at which an unconcealed firearm or other deadly weapon may be constitutionally carried.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 119, § 5, effective October 1, 1996; 2005, ch. 182, § 16, effective March 31, 2005; 2019 ch. 10, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Neither a fiscal court nor its county judge executive, or any other local official, can ban the possession or carrying in a public park the open or concealed carrying of firearms, except the fiscal court, which if it properly passes an ordinance, may prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed firearms in park buildings or portions thereof owned, leased or controlled by it.

OAG 96-39

.

While subsection (1) of this section recognizes the right of colleges and universities to control possession of deadly weapons, generally, on their properties, subsection (1) of this section limits other units of state government, city governments, county governments, urban-county governments, and charter county governments to prohibiting only the carrying of concealed deadly weapons. The Kentucky General Assembly, therefore, has recognized that the governing board of a college or university of this Commonwealth has a right to control the possession of all deadly weapons on its properties, regardless of whether the weapons are concealed or carried openly.

OAG 96-40

.

237.120.
Program for firearms instructor trainers for concealed deadly weapon training program — Qualification and certification requirements — In-service training — Fee.

The Department of Criminal Justice Training shall operate and maintain a program for firearms instructor trainers for the concealed deadly weapon training program. Only the General Assembly may eliminate the firearms instructor trainer program.

A firearms instructor trainer shall meet the requirements to be a firearms instructor and shall:

Possess a high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma;

Successfully complete a firearms instructor trainer course of not more than sixteen (16) hours provided by the department; and

Possess at least one (1) of the following valid firearms instructor certifications:

National Rifle Association Personal Protection Instructor;

National Rifle Association Pistol Marksmanship Instructor;

Certification from a Kentucky or other firearms instructor course offered by a state or federal governmental agency; or

Certification from another firearms instructor training course that has been determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training to be equivalent to one (1) of the above listed courses.

Certification as a firearms instructor trainer shall be valid for a period of three (3) years during which an instructor trainer shall:

Conduct or assist in at least one (1) firearms instructor course; or

Conduct or assist in at least one (1) applicant training course; and

Attend an instructor trainer/instructor in-service training course of not more than four (4) hours conducted by the department; and

Not have become ineligible to be a firearms instructor trainer.

The department shall conduct in-service training for firearms instructor trainers and certified firearms instructors. In-service training courses shall be held not less than twice each year in each congressional district and shall be offered at various times during the year ensuring that the maximum number of persons can attend. Preference shall be given to conducting in-service training classes on a Friday or a Saturday. Notice of the time, date, and location for in-service training for each calendar year shall be sent to each firearms instructor trainer and certified firearms instructor by mail or by e-mail not less than thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of the first class for each calendar year. The cost of the in-service training shall be not more than fifty dollars ($50).

At the end of the certification period, the department shall issue a new firearms instructor trainer certification to a person who has completed the provisions of this section, unless that firearms instructor trainer notifies the department in writing that he or she desires not to be recertified or is otherwise ineligible to be recertified. There shall be no charge for recertification. A firearms instructor trainer who has permitted his or her certification to expire may take the in-service course and be recertified for a period of up to one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of expiration of the certification without having to repeat the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

The fee for a firearms instructor trainer course shall be not more than one hundred dollars ($100). No portion of the fee shall be refunded to any student who fails or who does not complete the required course of training.

Any state agency or public university which owns a firing range shall make that range available to the department for the conduct of in-service training without charge if the department determines that for any particular year’s in-service training that range firing is required.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 240, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 63, § 28, effective June 29, 2017.

237.122.
Program for certification of firearms instructors for concealed deadly weapon program — Qualification and certification requirements — In-service training — Fees.

The Department of Criminal Justice Training shall operate and maintain a program for certification of firearms instructors for the concealed deadly weapon training program. Only the General Assembly may eliminate the certified firearms instructor program.

Training courses for certification of firearms instructors shall be conducted by firearms instructor trainers and the department.

An applicant to be a firearms instructor shall hold a concealed deadly weapon license issued pursuant to KRS

237.110

, and successfully complete a firearms instructor training course of not more than sixteen (16) hours provided by a certified firearms instructor trainer.

Certification as a firearms instructor shall be valid for a period of three (3) years during which an instructor shall:

Conduct or assist in at least one (1) applicant training course;

Attend an instructor trainer/instructor in-service training course of not more than four (4) hours conducted by the department; and

Not have become ineligible to be a firearms instructor.

The department shall conduct in-service training for firearms instructor trainers and certified firearms instructors as specified in KRS

237.120

.

At the end of the certification period, the department shall issue a new firearms instructor certification to any person who has completed the provisions of this section, unless the firearms instructor notifies the department in writing that he or she desires not to be recertified or is otherwise ineligible to be recertified. There shall be no charge for recertification. A firearms instructor who has permitted his or her certification to expire may take the in-service course and be recertified for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of expiration of the certification without having to repeat the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.

An instructor trainer shall charge a fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for a training course for a certified firearms instructor. The instructor shall remit fifty dollars ($50) to the department to defray the cost of materials which the department shall provide to the instructor.

No firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor shall charge a fee in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) for the conduct of an applicant training course. An instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor may charge a student the actual cost of range use, targets and associated range materials, and classroom rental not to exceed ten dollars ($10) for all of the items specified in this subsection. The instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor shall remit twenty-five dollars ($25) per student to the department to cover the provision of training materials distributed and providing evidence of successful completion of the course.

No portion of a fee collected pursuant to this section shall be refunded to a student who fails or does not complete the required course of instruction.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 240, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 96, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 182, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

237.124.
Program for training applicants for concealed deadly weapon license.

The Department of Criminal Justice Training shall operate a program for the training of applicants for a concealed deadly weapon license. Only the General Assembly may eliminate the training program for applicants for a concealed deadly weapon license.

Training pursuant to this section shall be conducted by a firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 5, effective July 15, 2002.

237.126.
Misrepresentation of having conducted training courses.

A firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor is guilty of not providing firearms training if he or she represents to the department that he or she has conducted training for a student firearms instructor or for an applicant in an applicant training course and has not, in fact, provided any such training.

Not providing firearms training is a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 6, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

237.128.
Providing incomplete firearms training.

A firearms instructor trainer or firearms instructor is guilty of providing incomplete firearms training if he or she represents to the department that he or she has conducted training for a student firearms instructor or for an applicant in an applicant training course and has not, in fact, provided lecture instruction, showed a required visual aid, conducted hands-on firearm safety training, provided range instruction and range firing, demonstrated firearm maintenance and cleaning procedures, or has permitted a student to qualify on a target on which the student has not achieved the marksmanship required by administrative regulation.

Providing incomplete firearms training is a Class D felony.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2017 ch. 182, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

237.130.
Failure to report nonreceipt of firearms training when receiving certification without notice to specified law enforcement or prosecutorial personnel.

A person is guilty of failure to report nonreceipt of firearms training when he or she receives certification that he or she has successfully completed a firearms instructor trainer, certified firearms instructor, or applicant training course and has not, in fact, received any such training and has not reported the matter in writing to the sheriff, Commonwealth’s attorney, or county attorney serving the county in which the training was conducted or has not made a written report to the Department of Kentucky State Police and provided a copy of the certification documents to the agency reported to along with the report. The report shall be made not more than thirty (30) working days after receiving documentation of successful completion of training, unless a request for additional time has been made and has been granted by an officer or agency to which the report shall be made.

Failure to report nonreceipt of firearms training is a Class A misdemeanor.

A person who makes a report pursuant to this section within the time frame specified in subsection (1) of this section shall not be prosecuted for a violation of this section and shall be eligible to reenroll in the level of class for which they were originally enrolled.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 267, effective June 26, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

237.132.
Failure to report insufficient firearms training when receiving certification without notice to specified law enforcement or prosecutorial personnel.

A person is guilty of failure to report insufficient firearms training when he or she receives certification that he or she has successfully completed a firearms instructor trainer, certified firearms instructor, or applicant training course and has not, in fact received lecture instruction, the showing of a required visual aid, hands-on firearm safety training, range instruction and range firing, a demonstration of firearm maintenance and cleaning procedures, or has not successfully completed the marksmanship requirement during range firing and has not reported the matter in writing to the sheriff, Commonwealth’s attorney, or county attorney serving the county in which the training was conducted or has not made a written report to the Department of Kentucky State Police and provided a copy of the certification documents to the agency reported to along with the report. The report shall be made not more than thirty (30) working days after receiving documentation of successful completion of training, unless additional time is requested and has been granted by an officer or agency to which a report shall be made.

Failure to report insufficient firearms training is a Class A misdemeanor.

A person who makes a report pursuant to this section within the time frame specified in subsection (1) of this section shall not be prosecuted for a violation of this section and shall be eligible to reenroll in the level of class for which the person was originally enrolled.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 268, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 182, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

237.134.
Investigation and prosecution of reports made pursuant to KRS 237.130 or 237.132 — Annual report to Legislative Research Commission.

When a report is made to the Department of Kentucky State Police pursuant to KRS

237.130

or

237.132

, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall notify the Commonwealth’s attorney and the county attorney for the county in which the training was conducted of the report and shall cooperate with them in the investigation and prosecution of the case.

When a report is made to a Commonwealth’s or county attorney pursuant to KRS

237.130

or

237.132

, the Commonwealth’s or county attorney shall notify the Department of Kentucky State Police of the report and shall cooperate with them in the investigation and prosecution of the case.

When a report is made to the Department of Criminal Justice Training alleging a violation of KRS

237.130

or

237.132

, the department shall notify the Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney of the county in which the training took place and shall make a notification of the report to the Department of Kentucky State Police.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall make an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission, not later than December 31 of each year, detailing each notice received pursuant to this section detailing:

The name of the firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor if that instructor trainer or instructor has been arrested or indicted as a result of the notification, otherwise the name shall be omitted;

The precise allegation;

Whether the allegation resulted in arrest or indictment;

Whether the allegation resulted in a trial, and the results of that trial; and

If the defendant was found guilty, the punishment imposed.

In or appended to the report specified in subsection (4) of this section the Department of Kentucky State Police shall report the number of arrests, indictments, trials, convictions, cases which were dismissed, and cases in which the defendant was found not guilty for failure to report nonreceipt of training and failure to report insufficient training.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 269, effective June 26, 2007.

237.136.
Suspension or revocation of certification or denial of recertification of firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor.

The Department of Criminal Justice Training may suspend or revoke the certification of a firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor who is found, after a hearing held in conformity with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B, to have violated a statute or administrative regulation relating to the concealed deadly weapon training program. The suspension of a certification may be for a period not to exceed five (5) years, and the department may require the person whose certification is suspended to successfully complete the level of course instruction for the certification which was suspended prior to reinstating the certification.

The department shall deny recertification to a person whose certification has been revoked pursuant to this section.

The department shall deny recertification to a person whose certification has been suspended for the remaining period of suspension.

The department may temporarily suspend the certification of a firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor prior to holding a hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B if the department believes that the safety of the public requires such an action. In the event that a certification is temporarily suspended prior to holding a hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, the department shall hold a Chapter 13B hearing not later than thirty (30) days from the date of the temporary suspension unless the defendant requests an extension for a time certain. If the defendant requests an extension for a time certain, then the certification shall remain suspended until the conclusion of the hearing.

A firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor who is the subject of an investigation shall be notified as required by KRS Chapter 13B and shall have, at all stages in the proceeding, the right to be represented by counsel.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 368, § 11, effective July 15, 2002.

237.137.
Concealed carry authority for off-duty and certified retired peace officers — Attempt to prevent authorized individual from carrying — Penalties.

Off-duty peace officers authorized to do so by the government employing the officer and retired peace officers certified under KRS

237.138

to

237.142

may carry concealed firearms on or about their persons at all times and at any location within the Commonwealth where an on-duty peace officer is permitted to carry firearms.

Any person who prevents or attempts to prevent an individual authorized under subsection (1) of this section from carrying a concealed firearm shall be guilty of a violation subject to a fine of:

Five hundred dollars ($500) for a first offense;

One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a second offense; and

Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a third or any subsequent offense.

A citation for the violation may be issued to an individual or an establishment where the violation occurs.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 106, § 1, effective April 13, 2016; 2017 ch. 182, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

237.138.
Application of KRS 237.138 to 237.142 to retired peace officers.

KRS

237.138

to

237.142

shall apply to any elected or appointed peace officer who is honorably retired and who:

Meets the provisions of the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act, 18

U.S.C. sec. 926

C;

Meets the provisions of KRS

237.138

to

237.142

; and

Desires to carry a concealed deadly weapon in conformity with the provisions of the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act, 18

U.S.C. sec. 926

C.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 182, § 11, effective March 31, 2005; 2006, ch. 240, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 18, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

237.140.
Certification for retired peace officer to carry concealed deadly weapon — Administrative regulations — Requirements — Firearms instruction.

Certification for a retired peace officer to carry a concealed deadly weapon pursuant to KRS

237.138

to

237.142

shall be administered by the Department of Kentucky State Police.

Costs of certification shall be paid for by moneys generated by the concealed deadly weapon license program under KRS

15.383

and collected by the Department of Kentucky State Police pursuant to that section.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A necessary to implement the provisions of KRS

237.138

to

237.142

. The regulations shall allow the validity of any license or certifying documentation issued to the retired peace officer under this section to be extended in yearly increments not more than four (4) times. To facilitate this objective, the regulations may authorize the material required by subsection (2) of this section to be submitted to the person supervising the firearms qualifications under subsection (4)(b) of this section, with that person then submitting the material to the Department of Kentucky State Police and signing the license or certification in a manner that satisfies the requirements of federal law as to the retiree’s passage of the required yearly firearms testing.

Each retired peace officer who desires certification to carry a concealed deadly weapon shall annually submit:

Evidence of retired status to the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police together with all information required by federal law, this section, and administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this section;

Evidence of successful completion of firearms qualification required under this section; and

A notarized statement that he or she is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a firearm.

Each law enforcement agency that employed the retired peace officer, or at which the retired peace officer served in an elected capacity, shall provide to the retired officer and the Department of Kentucky State Police the information required by federal law, this section, and the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this section in a prompt and efficient manner, without charge either to the Department of Kentucky State Police or the retiree.

Each retired peace officer shall annually fire twenty (20) rounds at an adult size silhouette target at a range of twenty-one (21) feet, with a handgun, and shall hit the target not less than eleven (11) times to obtain or maintain certification under KRS

237.138

to

237.142

.

The rounds fired pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be done under the supervision of:

A firearms instructor of the retiree’s former employing agency;

A currently certified peace officer who has successfully completed a Kentucky Law Enforcement Council approved firearms instructor course;

A Department of Criminal Justice Training certified police firearms instructor or instructor trainer; or

A Department of Criminal Justice Training certified concealed carry instructor or instructor trainer.

A firearms instructor may, if not compensated pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection, charge each participant a fee of not more than twenty dollars ($20), which shall include the cost of the range, firearms instructor, range personnel, targets, and all other costs associated therewith, but not the cost of ammunition. Ammunition, or the cost of ammunition, shall be provided by the retiree.

A local or state law enforcement agency that desires to conduct firearms qualification for its retirees shall schedule not less than two (2) dates for firearms qualification per year, and those dates shall be approximately six (6) months apart. The local or state law enforcement agency may charge each participant a fee of not more than twenty dollars ($20), which shall include the cost of use of the range, firearms instructor, range personnel, targets, and all other costs associated therewith, but not the cost of ammunition. Ammunition, or the cost of ammunition, shall be provided by the retiree.

No employer or appointing authority of a firearms instructor who has successfully completed a Kentucky Law Enforcement Council approved firearms instructor course, Department of Criminal Justice Training certified police firearms instructor or instructor trainer, or Department of Criminal Justice Training certified concealed carry instructor or instructor trainer shall prohibit or in any way limit the instructor from qualifying active or retired peace officers in conformity with KRS

237.138

or

237.142

while that instructor is off duty. No employer or appointing authority of an instructor specified in this paragraph shall be liable in civil damages for the actions or omissions of the instructor during qualification of active or retired peace officers when that instructor is off duty.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 182, § 12, effective March 31, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 270, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 47, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2014, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

237.142.
Availability of range facilities for retired peace officers.

The following agencies of the Commonwealth shall make range facilities available not less than four (4) days per year for firearms qualification by retired peace officers seeking certification pursuant to the provisions of KRS

237.138

to

237.142

:

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

The Department of Military Affairs; and

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.

Firearms qualification may be conducted at any location, public or private, at which a handgun may be safely fired. The safety of the location at which firing takes place shall be the responsibility of the instructor conducting the qualification.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 182, § 13, effective March 31, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 271, effective June 26, 2007.